Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 2

Inner City Safe Neighborhood Act of 1996

13-13-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Inner City Safe Neighborhood Act of 1996.”

Acts 1996, ch. 896, § 2.

13-13-202. Legislative findings and purpose.

The general assembly hereby finds that state government should do more to encourage and support community-based efforts of inner city residents to take a firm stand against the intrusion of drugs, crime, fear, decay and urban blight. By this enactment, the general assembly seeks to encourage and support such grassroots efforts and to foster a higher level of cooperation among public and private organizations seeking to address the special needs of such inner city residents.

Acts 1996, ch. 896, § 2.

13-13-203. “Safewalk” defined.

As used in this part, “safewalk” means a system of safe and secure, narrow linear parks, greenbelts, walkways, and sidewalks that function as pedestrian corridors linking inner city residential areas with schools, libraries, playgrounds, community centers, churches, grocery stores, and retail outlets.

Acts 1996, ch. 896, § 3.

13-13-204. Inner city safe neighborhood pilot demonstration project.

There is hereby created the inner city safe neighborhood pilot demonstration project. The purpose of the pilot demonstration project is to encourage, enhance, and evaluate the efforts of neighborhoods, local neighborhood development corporations, municipalities, counties, and state agencies to jointly and cooperatively plan, design, finance, construct, maintain, and secure safewalks within the inner city residential areas of the state's urban centers.

Acts 1996, ch. 896, § 4.

13-13-205. Grant applications — Approval.

The Tennessee neighborhood development corporation (TNDC) is authorized to solicit, receive, and review applications and to approve inner city safe neighborhood pilot demonstration project grants. To qualify for approval, a grant application must clearly reflect the highest level of mutual effort and cooperation in safewalk project planning, design, and support by each of the following parties:

The residents of the affected, inner city neighborhoods;

Grocers and other merchants doing business within the affected, inner city neighborhoods;

The local neighborhood development corporation or corporations, within whose boundaries such neighborhoods are located;

The municipality, within whose boundaries such neighborhoods are located;

The county, within whose boundaries such neighborhoods are located; and

Any state entity which has provided or which has agreed to provide financial or other resources for the safewalk project.

To qualify for approval, an application must also clearly identify the specific level of funding and other resources that have and/or will be allocated to the project by the residents of the affected neighborhoods, grocers and other merchants doing business within the affected neighborhoods, the local neighborhood development corporation, the municipality, the county, and any state entity which has provided and/or which has agreed to provide financial or other resources for the safewalk project. Furthermore, the application must also clearly identify all other proposed funding sources and resources for the project and must specify the methods by which the proposed safewalks will be secured against intrusion of criminal elements.

For purposes of this part, the commissioner of transportation shall serve as a member of the TNDC board of directors.

Acts 1996, ch. 896, § 5.

13-13-206. Applicability.

Inner city safe neighborhood pilot demonstration project grants shall be approved only for safewalk projects to be located within inner city areas of municipalities having a population in excess of one hundred fifty thousand (150,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1996, ch. 896, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. For table of populations of Tennessee municipalities see Volume 13 and its supplement.

13-13-207. Monitoring — Reporting.

The Tennessee neighborhood development corporation (TNDC) shall monitor and evaluate the effectiveness of safewalk projects in revitalizing and securing inner city neighborhoods. The TNDC shall periodically report interim findings and recommendations and shall submit a final report on the inner city safe neighborhood pilot demonstration project on or before January 1, 2000.

Acts 1996, ch. 896, § 7.

13-13-104. Local neighborhood development corporations.

13-13-108. Audit.